Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB273.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 304.48-080 is amended to read as follows:
A liability self-insurance group shall notify the commissioner[executive director]
immediately of any change in the information required to be filed under KRS 304.48-050
or in the manner of its compliance with KRS 304.48-070.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/13/2026 11:32 AM Jacketed